Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Chapter 10. Election Precincts, Election Officials, and Redistricting.

Editor’s notes. —

The provisions of this chapter refer to 42 U.S.C. 1973 et seq., (National Voter Registration Act of 1993), which was renumbered in 2014 as 52 U.S.C. 10101, et seq., by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.

Administrative Code. —

For election precincts, see 6 AAC, part 10.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 53-65.

Admissibility of parol evidence of election officials to impeach election returns. 46 ALR2d 1385.